Utah statutes.
76-8-314.   Threatening elected officials -- "Elected official" defined.

As used in this section, "elected official" means:

(1)  any elected official of the state, county, or city and includes the members of the official's immediate family;

(2)  any temporary judge appointed to fill a vacant judicial position;

(3)  any judge not yet retained by a retention election;

(4)  any member of a school board; and

(5)  any person appointed to fill a vacant position of an elected official as defined in Subsection (1).

